Washington statutes.
RCW 12.16.015

District court may compel attendance of witness.

Any person may be compelled to attend as a witness before a district court in accordance with chapter 5.56 RCW.

[ 1984 c 258 s 702.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.